Utah statutes.
32B-3-302.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Nuisance activity" means:

(a)  a judicial finding that a licensed establishment is a nuisance under Section 32B-4-208; or

(b)  an act described in Section 32B-3-303.

(2)  "Objecting governmental entity" means:

(a)  a local government entity;

(b)  a prosecutor's office; or

(c)  a law enforcement agency.

